vi: Vật liệu đầu dây giày: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Đồng đỏ; Niken; Nhựa; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Cotton phủ sáp; Hợp kim kẽm; Khác
de: Material der Schnürsenkelenden: Aluminium; Messing; Kupfer; Nickel; Kunststoff; Edelstahl; Stahl; Gewachste Baumwolle; Zinklegierung; Sonstige
sv: Material för skosnörens plastspetsar: Aluminium; Mässing; Koppar; Nickel; Plast; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Vaxad bomull; Zinklegering; Övrigt
pt-BR: Cadarço material da ponteira: Alumínio; Latão; Cobre; Níquel; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Algodão encerado; Liga de zinco; Outros
hr-HR: Materijal agleta vezice za cipele: Aluminij; Mjed; Bakar; Nikal; Plastika; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Voskani pamuk; Legura cinka; Drugo
nl: Schoenveter agletmateriaal: Aluminium; Messing; Koper; Nikkel; Plastic; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Gewaxt katoen; Zinklegering; Overig
fr: Matériau des embouts de lacets: Aluminium; Laiton; Cuivre; Nickel; Plastique; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Coton ciré; Alliage de zinc; Autre
hu: Cipőfűző végvédőjének anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Réz; Nikkel; Műanyag; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Viaszolt pamut; Cinkötvözet; Egyéb
ko: 신발끈 끝 부분 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 구리; 니켈; 플라스틱; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 왁싱 코튼; 아연 합금; 기타
fi: Kengännauhan pujottimen materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Kupari; Nikkeli; Muovi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Vahattu puuvilla; Sinkkiseos; Muu
da: Materiale i snørebåndsdupper: Aluminium; Messing; Kobber; Nikkel; Plastik; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Vokset bomuld; Zinklegering; Andet
tr: Ayakkabı bağcığı ucu malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bakır; Nikel; Plastik; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Mumlu pamuk; Çinko alaşımı; Diğer
zh-TW: 鞋帶頭材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 銅; 鎳; 塑膠; 不鏽鋼; 鋼; 蠟棉; 鋅合金; 其他
th: วัสดุสำหรับทำปลายเชือกรองเท้า: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; ทองแดง; นิกเกิล; พลาสติก; สเตนเลสสตีล; เหล็ก; ผ้าฝ้ายเคลือบแว็กซ์; ซิงก์อัลลอย; อื่นๆ
cs: Materiál tkaniček: Hliník; Mosaz; Měď; Nikl; Plast; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Voskovaná bavlna; Slitina zinku; Jiné
es: Material de las punteras de los cordones: Aluminio; Latón; Cobre; Níquel; Plástico; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Algodón encerado; Aleación de zinc; Otro
ja: 靴ひもアグレット素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; 銅; ニッケル; プラスチック; ステンレススチール; スチール; ワックスコットン; 亜鉛合金; その他
en: Shoelace aglet material: Aluminum; Brass; Copper; Nickel; Plastic; Stainless steel; Steel; Waxed cotton; Zinc alloy; Other
nb: Materiale i skolissetupp: Aluminium; Messing; Kobber; Nikkel; Plast; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Vokset bomull; Sinklegering; Annet
zh-CN: 鞋带头材质: 铝; 黄铜; 铜; 镍; 塑料; 不锈钢; 钢; 涂蜡棉; 锌合金; 其他
lt-LT: Batraiščio antgalio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Varis; Nikelis; Plastikas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Vaškuota medvilnė; Cinko lydinys; Kita
bg-BG: Материал на накрайниците на връзките за обувки: Алуминий; Месинг; Мед; Никел; Пластмаса; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Восъчен памук; Цинкова сплав; Друго
sk-SK: Materiál na konce šnúrok do topánok: Hliník; Mosadz; Meď; Nikel; Plast; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Voskovaná bavlna; Zliatina zinku; Iné
it: Materiale del puntale dei lacci delle scarpe: Alluminio; Ottone; Rame; Nichel; Plastica; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Cotone cerato; Lega di zinco; Altro
pt-PT: Material das pontas dos atacadores: Alumínio; Latão; Cobre; Níquel; Plástico; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Algodão encerado; Liga de zinco; Outro
ru: Материал наконечников шнурков: Алюминий; Латунь; Медь; Никель; Пластик; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Вощеный хлопок; Цинковый сплав; Другое
ro-RO: Material al capetelor de șireturi: Aluminiu; Alamă; Cupru; Nichel; Plastic; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Bumbac cerat; Aliaj de zinc; Altele
pl: Materiał skuwki sznurowadeł: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Miedź; Nikiel; Plastik; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Woskowana bawełna; Stop cynku; Inne
el: Υλικό άκρων κορδονιού παπουτσιού: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Χαλκός; Νικέλιο; Πλαστικό; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ατσάλι; Κερωμένο βαμβάκι; Κράμα ψευδαργύρου; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material zaključkov vezalk: Aluminij; Medenina; Baker; Nikelj; Plastika; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Voskan bombaž; Cinkova zlitina; Drugo